California, session 20252026, AB1239.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13012.9 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13012.9. The information published on the OpenJustice Web portal pursuant to Section 13010 shall include information concerning arrests for violations of Section 236.1 and the number of individuals reported as a victim of human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1, through the California Incident-Based Reporting System.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.